en: Yacht type: Explorer; Motor; Sailing; Sport; Other
nl: Jachttype: Explorer; Motor; Zeilen; Sport; Andere
hr-HR: Vrsta jahte: Istraživačka; Motorna; Jedrenjak; Sportska; Ostalo
pt-BR: Tipo de iate: Explorador; Motor; Navegação; Esporte; Outro
zh-CN: 游艇类型: 探险家; 电机; 帆船运动; 体育; 其他
de: Yachttyp: Entdecker; Motor; Segeln; Sport; Sonstiges
vi: Loại du thuyền: Du thuyền thám hiểm; Thuyền gắn máy; Thuyền buồm; Sport; Khác
zh-TW: 遊艇類型: 探險; 電動; 帆船; 運動; 其他
th: ประเภทเรือยอชท์: สำรวจ; เครื่องยนต์; เรือประเภทเรือใบ; กีฬา; อื่นๆ
cs: Typ jachty: Průzkumná; Motorová; Plachetní; Sport; Jiné
ja: ヨットの種類: エクスプローラー; モーター; セーリング; スポーツ; その他
es: Tipo de yate: Explorador; Motor; Navegación; Deportivo; Otros
hu: Jacht típusa: Felfedező; Motor; Vitorlázás; Sport; Egyéb
da: Yachttype: Explorer; Motor; Sejlads; Sport; Andet
fi: Jahtityyppi: Explorer; Moottori; Purjehdus; Urheilu; Muu
sl-SI: Vrsta jahte: Raziskovalna; Motorna; Jadralna; Šport; Drugo
lt-LT: Jachtos tipas: „Explorer“; Motorinė; Buriavimo; Sportinė; Kita
pt-PT: Tipo de iate: Explorador; Motor; Vela; Desporto; Outro
ru: Тип яхты: Эксплорер; Моторная; Парусная; Спортивная; Другая
ko: 요트 유형: 익스플로러; 모터; 세일링; 스포츠; 기타
it: Tipo di yacht: Explorer; A motore; A vela; Sport; Altro
bg-BG: Тип яхта: Изследователска; Моторна; Ветроходна; Спортна; Други
pl: Typ jachtu: Eksplorator; Silnik; Żeglarstwo; Sport; Inne
el: Τύπος γιοτ: Εξερευνητής; Μοτέρ; Ιστιοπλοΐα; Αθλητισμός; Άλλο
sk-SK: Typ jachty: Prieskumník; Motor; Plachtenie; Športové oblečenie; Iné
fr: Type de yacht: Exploration; Moteur; Voile; Sport; Autre
tr: Yat Tipi: Kaşif; Motor; Yelkenli; Spor; Diğer
nb: Yacht-type: Utforsker; Motor; Seiling; Sport; Annet
sv: Typ av yacht: Explorer; Motor; Segel; Sport; Övrigt
ro-RO: Tipul de iaht: Explorer; Motor; Navigare; Sport; Altele